Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska7-115
Disbarment and contempt cases; court costs, defined.

As used in sections 7-114 to 7-116, unless the context otherwise requires, court costs shall be deemed to include, but not be limited to: (1) Costs and fees otherwise authorized by statute; (2) all costs and expenses approved by the court which are incurred by reason of reference of the matter to a referee for the taking of testimony in accordance with the rules of the Supreme Court; and (3) all necessary costs and expenses incurred in investigation and preparation of charges leading to the institution of proceedings for suspension, censure, or disbarment, or all necessary costs and expenses incurred by the respondent in defending against such proceedings; Provided, the costs and expenses referred to in subdivision (3) shall be claimed by the successful party in the proceeding within thirty days after final disposition of the charges, after which the losing party shall have fifteen days in which to prepare and submit to the court objections to all or any part of such claim, whereupon the court without further hearing shall allow or disallow all or any part of such claim as costs, in its discretion.

Laws 1955, c. 8, § 2, p. 72.